North Dakota, session 69, SB2238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 47-32 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Sealing of records - Nonpayment of rent - Damage to property - Victim of domestic violence .
1. A person subject to a court order for eviction for nonpayment of rent or damage to the leased
premises, who has resolved all nonpayment of rent and damage claims, may move to have all
court records relating to the eviction proceedings sealed seven years after the order for
eviction has been satisfied, provided the person has not been evicted from another property
during the seven years following the eviction.
2. An individual who was subjected to domestic violence as defined under section 14 - 07.1 - 01 a t
the time of the victim's tenancy and was evicted from that tenancy because of a domestic
violence incident may move to have all court records relating to the eviction proceedings
sealed upon the conviction of the assailant for domestic violence or the issuance of a
disorderly conduct restraining order, sexual assault restraining order, or domestic violence
protection order against the assailant.

S. B. NO. 2238 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2238.
Senate Vote: Yeas 35 Nays 12 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 5 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State